Maryland, session 2025, HB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
12–508.
– 1 –

Ch. 738 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist may order and
administer a vaccination to an individual who is at least 3 years old if:
(i) The vaccine is:
1. An influenza vaccine;
2. A COVID–19 vaccine; or
3. Used in response to a public health emergency;
(ii) The pharmacist has completed a practical training program of at
least 20 hours that is approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and
includes:
1. Hands–on injection techniques;
2. Clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of
vaccines; and
3. The recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to
vaccines;
(iii) The pharmacist has a current certificate in basic
cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(iv) The pharmacist has completed a minimum of 2 hours of
continuing pharmaceutical education related to immunizations that is approved by the
Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education as part of the license renewal requirements
under § 12–309 of this title;
(v) The pharmacist complies with the record–keeping and reporting
requirements in paragraph (5) of this subsection and any corresponding regulations
adopted by the Board; and
(vi) If the vaccination is administered to an individual under the age
of 18 years, the pharmacist informs the child vaccination patient and adult caregiver who
is accompanying the child of the importance of well–child visits with a pediatric primary
care provider and refers the patient to a pediatric primary care provider when appropriate.
(2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii) through (vi) of this subsection may administer to an
individual who is at least 7 years old a vaccination that is:
(i) Recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 738
(ii) Approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection may administer to an
adult a vaccination that is recommended in the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Health Information for International Travel.
(4) (I) A pharmacist shall administer a vaccination under paragraph
(1), (2), or (3) of this subsection under a written protocol that:
[(i)] 1. Is vaccine specific; and
[(ii)] 2. Meets criteria established by the Department, in
consultation with the Board, the Board of Physicians, and the Board of Nursing, in
regulation.
(II) THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION
PRACTICES CITED IN THIS SECTION REFER TO FEDERAL STATUTES, RULES, AND
GUIDANCE IN EFFECT:
1. ON DECEMBER 31, 2024; OR
2. AT A LATER DATE TO ACCOUNT FOR ANY NEW
VACCINES RECOMMENDED BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION’S ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2024.
(5) A pharmacist shall:
(i) Report all vaccinations administered by the pharmacist to the
ImmuNet Program established under § 18–109 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) If the vaccination has been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s authorized prescriber
that the vaccination has been administered; and
(iii) Except for an influenza vaccination administered under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, if the authorized prescriber is not the individual’s primary
care provider or if the vaccination has not been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s primary care provider
or other usual source of care that the vaccination has been administered.
– 3 –

Ch. 738 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The Board shall:
(1) Set reasonable fees for the administration of vaccinations under this
section; and
(2) Adopt regulations that require a pharmacist to submit a registration
form to the Board that includes verification that the pharmacist:
(i) Has successfully completed a certification course approved by the
Board that included instruction in the guidelines and recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention regarding vaccinations IN EFFECT ON DECEMBER 31,
2024; and
(ii) Is certified in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation and obtained
the certification through in–person classroom instruction.
Article – Insurance
15–817.
(a) In this section, “child wellness services” means preventive activities designed
to protect children from morbidity and mortality and promote child development.
(b) This section applies to each individual hospital or major medical insurance
policy, group or blanket health insurance policy, and nonprofit health service plan that:
(1) is delivered or issued for delivery in the State;
(2) is written on an expense–incurred basis; and
(3) provides coverage for a family member of the insured.
(c) (1) A policy or plan subject to this section shall include under the family
member coverage a minimum package of child wellness services that are consistent with:
(i) public health policy;
(ii) professional standards; and
(iii) scientific evidence of effectiveness.
(2) The minimum package of child wellness services shall cover at least:
(i) all visits for and costs of childhood and adolescent
immunizations:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 738
1. recommended by the Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; OR
2. RECOMMENDED BY THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF
PEDIATRICS IN ITS CHILD AND ADOLESCENT IMMUNIZATION SCHEDULE BY AGE AS
OF DECEMBER 31, 2024;
(ii) visits for the collection of adequate samples, the first of which is
to be collected before 2 weeks of age, for hereditary and metabolic newborn screening and
follow–up between birth and 4 weeks of age;
(iii) universal hearing screening of newborns provided by a hospital
before discharge;
(iv) all visits for and costs of age–appropriate screening tests for
tuberculosis, anemia, lead toxicity, hearing, and vision as determined by the American
Academy of Pediatrics;
(v) all visits for obesity evaluation and management;
(vi) all visits for and costs of developmental screening as
recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics;
(vii) a physical examination, developmental assessment, and
parental anticipatory guidance services at each of the visits required under items (i), (ii),
(iv), (v), and (vi) of this paragraph; and
(viii) any laboratory tests considered necessary by the physician as
indicated by the services provided under items (i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii) of this paragraph.
(f) (1) A policy or plan subject to this section may not impose a deductible on
the coverage required under this section.
(2) Each health insurance policy and certificate shall contain a notice of the
prohibition established by paragraph (1) of this subsection in a form approved by the
Commissioner.
(G) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT SUBPARAGRAPH (C)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION, CONSISTENT WITH FEDERAL
STATUTES, RULES, AND GUIDANCE IN EFFECT:
(1) ON DECEMBER 31, 2024; OR
– 5 –

Ch. 738 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AT A LATER DATE TO ACCOUNT FOR ANY NEW VACCINES
RECOMMENDED BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S
ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2024.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026 June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –